Utah statutes.
22-5-5.   Assignment of security by a fiduciary -- Evidence of appointment
or incumbency.
A corporation or transfer agent making a transfer pursuant to an assignment by
a fiduciary who is not the registered owner shall obtain the following
evidence of appointment or incumbency:
(1)  in the case of a fiduciary appointed or qualified by a court, a
certificate issued by or under the direction or supervision of that court or
an officer thereof and dated within 60 days before the transfer; or
(2)  in any other case, a copy of a document showing the appointment or a
certificate issued by or on behalf of a person reasonably believed by the
corporation or transfer agent to be responsible or, in the absence of such a
document or certificate, other evidence reasonably deemed by the corporation
or transfer agent to be appropriate. Corporations and transfer agents may
adopt standards with respect to evidence of appointment or incumbency under
this subsection provided such standards are not manifestly unreasonable.
Neither the corporation nor transfer agent is charged with notice of the
contents of any document obtained pursuant to this subsection except to the
extent that the contents relate directly to the appointment or incumbency.
